bg_CS.dic
ꙗсъ/VASPSQ	po:verb
блѫдь/KKB0	po:stem
богатьство/S0S3	po:noun
божий/B4	po:adj
божь/KKB0	po:stem
больи/BA	po:adj
больнъ/B5	po:adj
босъ/B5	po:adj
брашьно/S0S3	po:noun
буй/B4	po:adj
бѣдьно/SE	po:adverb
вꙑшьи/BA	po:adj
валити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
варение/S2	po:noun
варити/V6SP	po:verbinf
варитъ/V4A1SP	po:verbinf
ведро/S0	po:noun
великъ/B5	po:adj
величь/KKB1	po:stem
величьѥ/S1	po:noun
велѣн/KKB1	po:stem
весельѥ/S1	po:noun
вести/VHV6SR	po:verbinf
вино/S0S3	po:noun
влѣчение/S2SP	po:noun
водити/SQV6	po:verbinf
волен/KKB1SF	po:stem
волити/V6SF	po:verbinf
волитъ/V4A1SF	po:verb
вонитъ/V4A1SF	po:verb
вонѣти/V6SF	po:verbinf
вражий/B4	po:adj
вранъ/B5	po:adj
вратитъ/SRV4	po:verb
врьжетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
врѣдитъ/V4A1SF	po:verb
врѣменьно/SE
врѣсти/SRV6	po:verbinf
възѧтие/S1	po:noun
възѧтѥ/S1	po:noun
вьритъ/V4SQ	po:verb
вѣꙗти/V6SQSR	po:verbinf
вѣди/KKVGSR	po:verbimp
вѣдро/S0	po:noun
вѣдѣти/VHV6SR	po:verbinf
вѣдѫ/KKVCSR	po:adv
вѣко/S0	po:noun
вѣрьнъ/B5SN	po:adj
вѣсити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
вѣстити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
вѧжетъ/V3SQSR	po:verb
вѧщьи/BA	po:adj
вѫже/S2	po:noun
гасати/SUV6	po:verbinf
гаснети/SUSRV6	po:verbinf
гаснетъ/SUV1A1	po:verb
глаголан/KKB2	po:noun
гладьнъ/B5	po:adj
гласити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
гласьно/SE	po:adverb
гнѣтити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
говѧдо/S0	po:noun
говѧждь/B4	po:adj
голѫбинъ/B5	po:adj
горитъ/V4A1SQSR	po:verb
горьи/BA	po:adj
горѣти/V6SQSR	po:verbinf
господьнь/B4	po:adj
гръло/S0S3	po:noun
даꙗти/V6SQSP	po:verbinf
даетъ/V3A1SPSQ	po:verb
далъ/VBSPSQSR	po:adverb
дание/S1SPSQ	po:noun
данъ/VBSPSQSR	po:adverb
данѥ/S1SPSQ	po:noun
дастъ/SPSRV5A1	po:verb
дати/SPSRV6	po:verb
добръ/B5	po:adj
добрѣи/BB	po:adj
драгъ/B5	po:adj
дражьи/BA	po:adj
дружьнь/B4	po:adj
дрѣво/NSS0	po:noun
дѫбьѥ/S1	po:noun
езеро/S0	po:noun
желаньѥ/S1	po:noun
желѣꙁо/S0	po:noun
желѣзо/S0	po:noun
жестокъ/B5	po:adj
жилище/S2	po:noun
жрѣло/S0	po:noun
жѧло/S0	po:noun
законьно/SE	po:adverb
землетъ/V3SQ	po:verb
знаменьѥ/S1	po:noun
зоровати/V6SR	po:verbinf
зъло/S0	po:noun
зълъ/B5	po:adj
зьритъ/V4A1SQ	po:verb
идетъ/V1A1SR	po:verb
искати/V6SRSQ	po:verbinf
ищетъ/V1A1SRSQ	po:verb
кꙑпитъ/V4A1SQ	po:verb
казанѥ/S1SR	po:noun
камен/KKB2	po:stem
кладꙑчьство/S0S3	po:noun
копьѥ/S1	po:noun
крꙑваетъ/V3A1SR	po:verb
крилатъ/B5	po:adj
крило/S0S3	po:noun
крьстити/SRV6	po:verb
крѣпльи/BA	po:adj
крѣпъкъ/B5	po:adj
кънѧжь/B4	po:adj
лагати/V6SRSQ	po:verbinf
лагаѥтъ/V3A1SRSQ	po:verb
летъ/SQV3	po:verb
листьѥ/S1	po:noun
ложе/S2	po:noun
ложити/V6SPSQ	po:verbinf
ложитъ/V4A1SPSQ	po:verb
лучьи/BA	po:adj
люущьи/BA	po:adj
лѣпитъ/V4A1SP	po:verb
лѣсти/V6SR	po:verbinf
лѣѥтъ/SQV3	po:verb
малъ/B5	po:adj
манетъ/SRV1A1	po:verb
матерь/B4	po:adj
матерьнь/B4	po:adj
милосрьдьѥ/S1	po:noun
можданъ/B5	po:adj
можетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
морѥ/S1
моѥ/S1
мрѣхъ/V9SU	po:verb
мъножьство/S0S3	po:noun
мьньи/BA	po:adj
мѣнетъ/SRV1A1	po:verb
мѣритъ/V4SQ	po:verb
мѧкъкъ/B5	po:adj
мѫжьство/S0S3	po:noun
мѫщение/S1	po:noun
нашати/V6SQ	po:verbinf
никнѫти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
нища/B8	po:adj
нищо/B9	po:adj
нищь/B4	po:adj
нѣсъ/VASPSQSR	po:verb
овчьий/B4	po:adj
орало/S0	po:noun
памѧтьѥ/S1	po:noun
поетъ/V3A1SQ	po:verb
поздьнъ/B5	po:adv
познан/KKB1	po:stem
полѥ/S1	po:noun
послание/S1	po:noun
посланѥ/S1	po:noun
приморѥ/S1	po:noun
пророчь/B4	po:adj
прошен/KKB2	po:noun
пѫто/S0S3	po:noun
рало/S0	po:noun
растити/V6SQ	po:verbinf
ровъ/G0SP	po:noun
свободьнъ/B5	po:adj
селище/S2	po:noun
село/S0	po:noun
синь/B4	po:adj
скврьнь/B0	po:noun
скѫдельниковъ/B5	po:adj
словетъ/V1A1SF	po:verb
слови/VFSF	po:verbimp
слъвъ/B5	po:adj
смрьт/KKSEB1	po:stem
срьдьце/S2	po:verb
старъ/B5	po:adj
сульи/BA	po:adj
съвѣдѣтельство/S0S3	po:noun
съдравиѥ/S1	po:noun
съдравьѥ/S1	po:noun
сѣкнетъ/SUV1A1	po:verb
сѣкнѫти/SUV6	po:verbinf
творилъ/VBSR	po:passive
тлъстъ/B5	po:adj
уньи/BA	po:adj
усмѣнъ/B5	po:adj
ухо/S0	po:noun
ходити/SRSQVHV6	po:verbinf
худъ/B5	po:adj
хуждьи/BA	po:adj
цвисъ/VASPSR	po:verb
цѣсаритъ/V4SQ	po:verbinf
чловѣчь/B4	po:adj
чѧти/V6SQ	po:verbinf
ширьи/BA	po:adj
шуй/B4	po:adj
ѧтро/S0	po:noun
ѫже/S2
ѫжище/S2	po:noun
ложихъ/V9SPSQ	po:verbaor
овощьнъ/B5	po:adj
несъщь/VI	po:gerund
нищь/B4	po:adj
несъщо/B9
хвалѧщь/VI	po:gerund
вьсѣкъ/B5	po:adj
